Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 197.626 is amended to read:
197.626. (1) A local government shall submit for review and the Land Conservation  and Devel-
opment Commission shall review the following final  land use decisions in the manner provided for
review of a work task under ORS 197.633 and subject to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) An amendment of an urban growth boundary by a metropolitan service district that  adds
more than 100 acres to the area within its urban growth boundary;
(b) An amendment of an urban growth boundary by a city with a population  of 2,500 or more
within its urban growth boundary that adds more than 50 acres  to the area within the urban growth
boundary;
(c) A designation of  an area as an urban reserve under ORS 197A.230 to 197A.250 by a metro-
politan service district or by a city with a population of 2,500  or more within its urban growth
boundary;
(d) An amendment of the boundary of an urban reserve by a metropolitan service district;
(e) An amendment of the boundary of an urban reserve to add more than 50 acres  to the urban
reserve by a city with a population of 2,500 or more within its urban growth boundary; and
(f) A designation or an amendment to the designation  of a rural reserve under ORS 197A.230 to
197A.250 by a county, in coordination with a metropolitan service district, and the  amendment of
the designation.
(2) When the commission reviews a final land  use decision of a metropolitan service district
under subsection  (1)(a), (c), (d) or (f) of this section, the commission shall issue a final order in
writing within 180 days after the commission votes whether to approve the decision.
(3) When reviewing an amendment of an  urban growth boundary under subsection (1)(b) of this
section and ORS chapter 197A:
(a) At the request of and in coordination with the city, the Director of  the Department of Land
Conservation and Development shall parse work tasks  in a manner that allows the Department of
Land Conservation  and Development to issue final orders approving or remanding sequential phases
required for completion of the work tasks, including a final order approving:
(A) An inventory of buildable lands and an  opportunities analysis under a goal relating to eco-
nomic activities or an inventory of buildable lands and  a needs analysis under a goal relating to
housing needs.
(B) An estimation of the land need under a goal relating to economic activities.
Enrolled House Bill 4026 (HB 4026-A) Page 1
(C) Any response to the department regarding approval of the estimation of  land need, including
changes proposed to comprehensive plan designations or land use zones.
(b)(A) The director shall take action on  each sequential phase of a work task described in par-
agraph (a) of  this subsection not later than 90 days after the local government submits the phase
for review, unless the local government waives the 90-day deadline or  the commission grants the
director an extension.
(B) If the director does not take action within the time period  required by subparagraph (A) of
this paragraph, the sequential phase of the work task is deemed approved.
(c) The director may approve or remand a sequential  phase of a work task or refer the phase
of the work task to the commission for a decision. A decision  by the director to approve or remand
a phase of the work task may be appealed to the commission.
(d) The director shall provide a letter to the local  government certifying the approval of each
sequential phase of a  work task, unless an interested party has filed a timely objection to the phase
of the work task consistent with administrative rules for conducting periodic review.
(4) A final order of the commission under this section may be appealed to the  Court of Appeals
in the manner described in ORS 197.650 and 197.651.
(5) A local government determination described in subsection (1) of this section is not
subject to  being referred to voters by referendum petition and is reviewable exclusively un-
der this section.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 197.626 by section 1  of this 2024 Act apply to all
local government determinations described in ORS 197.626  (1) made on or after January 1,
2023.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 29, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4026 (HB 4026-A) Page 2